California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 display described in subdivision (a) may remain until January 1, 2023, after which date the display shall be removed, unless it otherwise qualifies as a lawful advertising display pursuant to this section, without the payment of any compensation to the owner or operator. On and after January 1, 2022, the City of Inglewood may for good cause request from the department an extension beyond January 1, 2023, not to exceed the expiration of the redevelopment project area. “Good cause” for these purposes means that all of the following are satisfied: (1) there has been a finding by the City of Inglewood that the advertising display has had a positive economic impact on the redevelopment project area and provides a public benefit, (2) there have been no violations by the display owner or operator of this section or of any applicable illumination standards in the previous 10 years that have not been corrected within 30 days of the date of mailing of a violation notice to the owner or operator by the department, and
 (3) there has been compliance by the owner and operator with all other standards adopted by the City of Inglewood or by the department.

(c) The City of Inglewood shall be responsible for ensuring that an advertising display is consistent with this section and provides a public benefit. This provision shall not be construed to preclude any enforcement authority of the department under this chapter.

(d) The City of Inglewood shall annually certify to the department, by December 31 of each year, that at least 10 percent of the advertising copy, up to a maximum of 100 square feet, is used to display the address or location or locations of the business or activity or to identify the route to the business or activity from the nearest freeway offramp. The department may independently review compliance with this certification. An advertising display subject to this section shall be
 removed if it is in violation of this section more than three times within a 10-year period and the violation has not been corrected within 30 days of the date of mailing of a violation notice to the owner or operator by the department.

(e) The City of Inglewood shall have primary responsibility for ensuring that the advertising display authorized pursuant to this section remains in conformance with all of the provisions of this section. If the City of Inglewood fails to do so within 30 days of the date of mailing of a notice to the city by the department, the city shall hold the department harmless and indemnify the department for all costs incurred by the department to ensure compliance with this section or to defend actions challenging the authorization of displays pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 869, Sec. 1.   (SB 1199)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5273.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5273, for the purposes of this chapter, in the City of Buena Park in Orange County, the Cities of Commerce, Covina, and South Gate in Los Angeles County, and the City of Victorville in San Bernardino County, advertising displays advertising those businesses and activities developed within the boundary limits of, and as a part of, any redevelopment agency project area or areas may, with the consent of the redevelopment agency governing the project area, be considered to be on the premises anywhere within the legal
 boundaries of the redevelopment agency’s project area or areas for a period not to exceed 10 years or the completion of the project, whichever occurs first, after which Sections 5272 and 5405 apply, unless an arrangement has been made for extension of the period between the redevelopment agency and the department for good cause.

(b) The governing body of a redevelopment agency in the cities set forth in subdivision (a), upon approving the purchase, lease, or other authorization for the erection of an advertising display pursuant to this section, shall prepare, adopt, and submit to the department an application for the issuance of a permit that, at a minimum, includes a finding that the advertising display would not result in a concentration of displays that will have a negative impact on the safety or aesthetic quality of the community. The department shall only deny the application if the proposed structure violates Sections 5400 to 5405,
 inclusive, or subdivision (d) of Section 5408, or if the display would cause a reduction in federal-aid highway funds as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 818, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5274.

(a) None of the provisions of this chapter, except those in Article 4 (commencing with Section 5300), Sections 5400 to 5404, inclusive, and subdivision (d) of Section 5405, apply to an on-premises advertising display that is visible from an interstate or primary highway and located within a business center, if the display is placed and maintained pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 5490) and meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The display is placed within the boundaries of an individual development project, as defined in Section 65928 of the Government Code, for commercial, industrial, or mixed commercial and industrial purposes, as shown on a subdivision or site map approved by a city, county, or city and county, and is developed and zoned for those purposes.

(2) The display identifies the name of the business center, if named.

(3) Each business identified on the display is located within the business center and on the same side of an interstate or primary highway where the display is located.

(4) The governing body of the city, county, or city and county has adopted ordinances for the display pursuant to Sections 5230 and 5231 for the area where the display will be placed,
 and the display meets city, county, or city and county ordinances.

(5) The display results in a consolidation of allowable displays within the business center, so that fewer displays will be erected as a result of the display.

(6) Placement of the display does not cause a reduction of federal aid highway funds as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 471, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.   Note: Sec. 3 of Ch. 471 repealed Sec. 3 of Stats. 1996, Ch. 495, which otherwise would have repealed, on January 1, 1999, the addition of this section by Sec. 1 of Ch. 495.)
-------------------------------------------

5275.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the director may not regulate noncommercial, protected speech contained within any advertising display authorized by, or exempted from, this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 81, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licenses [5300. - 5303.]

5300.

(a) A person engages in the business of outdoor advertising whenever, personally or through employees, that person places an advertising display, changes the advertising message of an advertising display that does not pertain exclusively to that person’s business and is visible to a state highway or freeway.

(b) A manufacturer or distributor of a product for sale to the general public does not engage in the business of outdoor advertising when furnishing a sign pertaining to the product to a retailer of that product for installation on the retailer’s place of business or when installing on the retailer’s place of business a sign containing advertising pertaining to the product, the name or the business of the retailer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 787, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5301.

No person shall engage in or carry on the business or occupation of outdoor advertising without first having paid the license fee provided by this chapter. The fee is payable annually in advance on the first day of July of each year to the director or his authorized agent. Each license shall remain in force for the term of one year from and after the first day of July, and may be renewed annually.

A license shall be obtained whether or not the advertising display requires a permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.

All licenses issued on or after the first day of July shall expire on the 30th day of June following the date of issue. Fees for original licenses issued after the first day of July of each year shall be apportioned and collected on the basis of one-twelfth of the fee for each month or part thereof remaining in the fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5303.

Every application for a license shall be made on a form to be furnished by the director. It shall state the full name of the applicant and the post office address of his fixed place of business and shall contain a certification that the applicant has obtained a copy of the provisions of this chapter and any regulations adopted thereunder and is aware of their contents.

The issuance of a license entitles the holder to engage in or carry on the outdoor advertising business and to apply for permits during the term of the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 653, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Permits [5350. - 5367.]

5350.

No person shall place any advertising display within the areas affected by the provisions of this chapter in this state without first having secured a written permit from the director or from his authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5351.

Every person desiring a permit to place any advertising display shall file an application with the director or with his authorized agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1003, Sec. 1.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5353.

The application shall be filed on a blank to be furnished by the director or by his agent. It shall set forth the name and address of the applicant and shall contain a general description of the property upon which it is proposed to place the advertising display for which a permit is sought and a diagram indicating the location of the proposed advertising display on the property, in such a manner that the property and the location of the proposed advertising display may be readily ascertained and identified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5354.

(a) The applicant for any permit shall offer written evidence that both the owner or other person in control or possession of the property upon which the location is situated and the city or the county with land use jurisdiction over the property upon which the location is situated have consented to the placing of the advertising display.

(b) At the written request of the city or county with land use jurisdiction over the property upon which a location is situated, the department shall reserve the location and shall not issue a permit for that location to any applicant, other than the one specified in the request, in advance of receiving written evidence as provided in subdivision (a) and for a period of time not to exceed 90 days from the date the department received the request.

(c) In addition to the 90-day period set forth in subdivision (b), an additional period of 30 days may be granted at the discretion of the department upon any proof, satisfactory to the department and provided by the city or county making the original request for a 90-day period, of the existence of extenuating circumstances meriting an additional 30 days. There shall be a conclusive presumption in favor of the department that the granting or denial of the request for an additional 30 days was made in compliance with this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 972, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5355.

An application for a permit to place a display shall contain a description of the display, including its material, size, and subject and the proposed manner of placing it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 653, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5357.

If the applicant for a permit is engaged in the outdoor advertising business, the application shall contain the number of the license issued by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5358.

When the application is in full compliance with this chapter and if the advertising display will not be in violation of any other state law, the director or the director’s authorized agent shall, within 10 days after compliance and upon payment by the applicant of the fee provided by this chapter, issue a permit to place the advertising display for the remainder of the calendar year in the year in which the permit is issued and for an additional four calendar years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 152, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5359.

(a) The issuance of a permit for the placing of an advertising display includes the right to change the advertising copy without obtaining a new permit and without the payment of any additional permit fee.

(b) The issuance of a permit does not affect the obligation of the owner of the advertising display to comply with a zoning ordinance applicable to the advertising display under the provisions of this chapter nor does the permit prevent the enforcement of the applicable ordinance by the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 152, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5360.

(a) The director shall establish a permit renewal term of five years, which shall be reflected on the face of the permit.

(b) The director shall adopt regulations for permit renewal that include procedures for late renewal within a period not to exceed one year from the date of permit expiration. Any permit that was not renewed after January 1, 1993, is deemed revoked.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 152, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5361.

Each permit provided in this chapter shall carry an identification number and shall entitle the holder to place the advertising display described in the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5362.

No person shall place any advertising display unless there is securely fastened upon the front thereof an identification number plate of the character specified in Section 5363. The placing of any advertising display without having affixed thereto an identification number plate is prima facie evidence that the advertising display has been placed and is being maintained in violation of the provisions of this chapter, and any such display shall be subject to removal as provided in Section 5463.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5363.

Identification number plates shall be furnished by the director. Identification number plates shall bear the identification number of the advertising display to which they are assigned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5364.

The provisions of this article shall apply to any advertising display which was lawfully placed and which was in existence on November 7, 1967, adjacent to an interstate or primary highway and within the limits of an incorporated area, but for which a permit has not heretofore been required. A permit which is issued pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be a renewal of an original permit for an existing advertising display.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1074.)
-------------------------------------------

5365.

When a highway within an incorporated area is designated as an interstate or a primary highway, each advertising display maintained adjacent to such highway shall thereupon become subject to all of the provisions of this act. For purposes of applying the provisions of this act, each such display shall be considered as though it had been placed along an interstate or a primary highway during all of the time that it had been in existence. Within 30 days of notification by the director of such highway designation, the owner of each advertising display adjacent to such highway shall notify the director of the location of such display on a form prescribed by the director. The director shall issue a permit for each such advertising display on the basis of the notification from the display owner; provided that such permits will be issued and renewed only if the owner pays the fees required by subdivision (b) of Section 5485. Each permit issued pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be a renewal of an original permit for an existing advertising display.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1074.)
-------------------------------------------

5366.

The issuance of a permit pursuant to this chapter does not allow any person to erect an advertising display in violation of any ordinance of any city, county, or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 653, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

5367.

The department shall not deny or delay the acceptance of a permit application for a new advertising display along a portion of a new alignment of an interstate or primary highway on the basis that the highway project has not been accepted by the department as complete if the section of highway is open to the use of the public for vehicular travel within 1,000 feet of the location specified in the permit application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 313, Sec. 1.   (SB 364)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Regulations [5400. - 5419.]

5400.

No advertising structure may be maintained unless the name of the person owning or maintaining it, is plainly displayed thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5401.

No advertising structure shall be placed unless it is built to withstand a wind pressure of 20 pounds per square foot of exposed surface. Any advertising structure not conforming to this section shall be removed as provided in Section 5463.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5402.

No person shall display or cause or permit to be displayed upon any advertising structure or sign, any statements or words of an obscene, indecent or immoral character, or any picture or illustration of any human figure in such detail as to offend public morals or decency, or any other matter or thing of an obscene, indecent or immoral character.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5403.

No advertising display shall be placed or maintained in any of the following locations or positions or under any of the following conditions or if the advertising structure or sign is of the following nature:

(a) If within the right-of-way of any highway.

(b) If visible from any highway and simulating or imitating any directional, warning, danger or information sign permitted under the provisions of this chapter, or if likely to be
 mistaken for any permitted sign, or if intended or likely to be construed as giving warning to traffic, by, for example, the use of the words “stop” or “slow down.”

(c) If within any stream or drainage channel or below the floodwater level of any stream or drainage channel where the advertising display might be deluged by flood waters and swept under any highway structure crossing the stream or drainage channel or against the supports of the highway structure.

(d) If not maintained in safe condition.

(e) If visible from any highway and displaying any red or blinking or intermittent light likely to be mistaken for a warning or danger signal.

(f) If visible from any highway which is a part of the interstate or primary systems, and which is placed upon
 trees, or painted or drawn upon rocks or other natural features.

(g) If any illumination shall impair the vision of travelers on adjacent highways. Illuminations shall be considered vision impairing when its brilliance exceeds the values set forth in Section 21466.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(h) If visible from a state regulated highway displaying any flashing, intermittent, or moving light or lights.

(i) If, in order to enhance the display’s visibility, the owner of the display or anyone acting on the owner’s behalf removes, cuts, cuts down, injures, or destroys any tree, shrub, plant, or flower growing on property owned by the department that is visible from the highway without a permit issued pursuant to Section 670 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 284, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5404.

No advertising display shall be placed outside of any business district as defined in the Vehicle Code or outside of any unincorporated city, town or village, or outside of any area that is subdivided into parcels of not more than 20,000 square feet each in area in any of the following locations or positions, or under any of the following conditions, or if the advertising display is of the following nature:

(a) If within a distance of 300 feet from the point of intersection of highway or of highway and railroad right-of-way lines, except that this does not prevent the placing of advertising display on that side of
 an intercepted highway that is opposite the point of interception. But in case any permanent building, structure or other object prevents any traveler on any such highway from obtaining a clear view of approaching vehicles for a distance of 300 feet, then advertising displays may be placed on such buildings, structure or other object if such displays will not further obstruct the vision of those approaching the intersection or interception, or if any such display does not project more than one foot therefrom.

(b) If placed in such a manner as to prevent any traveler on any highway from obtaining a clear view of approaching vehicles for a distance of 500 feet along the highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5405.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no advertising display shall be placed or maintained within 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of, and the copy of which is visible from, any interstate or primary highway, other than any of the following:

(a) Directional or other official signs or notices that are required or authorized by law, including, but not limited to, signs pertaining to natural wonders and scenic and historical attractions, and which comply with regulations adopted
 by the director relative to their lighting, size, number, spacing, and any other requirements as may be appropriate to implement this chapter which are consistent with national standards adopted by the United States Secretary of Transportation pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(b) Advertising displays advertising the sale or lease of the property upon which they are located, if all advertising displays within 660 feet of the edge of the right-of-way of a bonus segment comply with the regulations adopted under Sections 5251 and 5415.

(c) Advertising displays which advertise the business conducted, services rendered, or goods produced or sold upon the property upon which the advertising display is placed, if the display is upon the same side of the highway as the advertised activity; and if all advertising displays within 660 feet of
 the right-of-way of a bonus segment comply with the regulations adopted under Sections 5251, 5403, and 5415; and except that no advertising display shall be placed after January 1, 1971, if it contains flashing, intermittent, or moving lights (other than that part necessary to give public service information, including, but not limited to, the time, date, temperature, weather, or similar information, or a message center display as defined in subdivision (d)).

(d) (1) Message center displays that comply with all requirements of this chapter. The illumination or the appearance of illumination resulting in a message change of a message center display is not the use of flashing, intermittent, or moving light for purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 5408, except that no message center display may include any illumination or message change that is in motion or appears to be in motion or that changes in intensity or exposes its
 message for less than four seconds. No message center display may be placed within 1,000 feet of another message center display on the same side of the highway. No message center display may be placed in violation of Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(2) Any message center display located beyond 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway and permitted by a city, county, or city and county on or before December 31, 1988, is in compliance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 5350) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 5400) for purposes of this section.

(3) Any message center display legally placed on or before December 31, 1996, which does not conform with this section may continue to be maintained under its existing criteria if it advertises only the business conducted, services rendered, or goods produced or sold upon the
 property upon which the display is placed.

(4) This subdivision does not prohibit the adoption by a city, county, or city and county of restrictions or prohibitions affecting off-premises message center displays which are equal to or greater than those imposed by this subdivision, if that ordinance or regulation does not restrict or prohibit on-premises advertising displays, as defined in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 5490).

(e) Advertising displays erected or maintained pursuant to regulations of the director, not inconsistent with the national policy set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code and the standards promulgated thereunder by the Secretary of Transportation, and designed to give information in the specific interest of the traveling public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 787, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5405.3.

Nothing in this chapter, including, but not limited to, Section 5405, shall prohibit the placing of temporary political signs, unless a federal agency determines that such placement would violate federal regulations. However, no such sign shall be placed within the right-of-way of any highway or within 660 feet of the edge of and visible from the right-of-way of a landscaped freeway.

A temporary political sign is a sign which:

(a) Encourages a particular vote in a scheduled election.

(b) Is placed not
 sooner than 90 days prior to the scheduled election and is removed within 10 days after that election.

(c) Is no larger than 32 square feet.

(d) Has had a statement of responsibility filed with the department certifying a person who will be responsible for removing the temporary political sign and who will reimburse the department for any cost incurred to remove it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

5405.5.

In addition to those displays permitted pursuant to Section 5405, displays erected and maintained pursuant to regulations of the director, which will not be in violation of Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, and which identify the location of a farm produce outlet where farmers sell directly to the public only those farm or ranch products they have produced themselves, may be placed or maintained within 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way so that the copy of the display is visible from a highway.

The advertising displays shall indicate the location of the farm products but not the price of any
 product and shall not be larger than 150 square feet.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 517, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5405.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no outdoor advertising display that exceeds 10 feet in either length or width, shall be built on any land or right-of-way owned by the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority, including any of its rights-of-way, unless the authority complies with any applicable provisions of this chapter, the federal Highway Beautification Act of 1965 (23 U.S.C.A. Sec. 131), and any local regulatory agency’s rules or policies concerning outdoor advertising displays. The authority shall not disregard or preempt any law,
 ordinance, or regulation of any city, county, or other local agency involving any outdoor advertising display.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 928, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5406.

The provisions of Sections 5226 and 5405 shall not apply to bonus segments which traverse and abut on commercial or industrial zones within the boundaries of incorporated municipalities, as such boundaries existed on September 21, 1959, wherein the use of real property adjacent to and abutting on the national system of interstate and defense highways is subject to municipal regulation or control, or which traverse and abut on other business areas where the land use, as of September 21, 1959, was clearly established by state laws as industrial or commercial, provided that advertising displays within 660 feet of the edge of the right-of-way of such bonus segments shall be subject
 to the provisions of Section 5408.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5407.

The provisions of Sections 5226 and 5405 shall not apply to penalty segments which are located, or which are to be located, in business areas and which comply with Section 5408, except that Sections 5226 and 5405 shall apply to unzoned commercial or industrial areas in which the commercial or industrial activity ceases and is removed or permanently converted to other than a commercial or industrial activity, and displays in such areas shall be removed not later than five years following the cessation, removal, or conversion of the commercial or industrial activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5408.

In addition to the advertising displays permitted by Section 5405 to be placed within 660 feet of the edge of the right-of-way of interstate or primary highways, advertising displays conforming to the following standards, and not in violation of any other provision of this chapter, may be placed in those locations if placed in business areas:

(a) Advertising displays may not be placed that exceed 1,200 square feet in area with a maximum height of 25 feet and a maximum length of 60 feet, including
 border and trim, and excluding base or apron supports and other structural members. This subdivision shall apply to each facing of an advertising display. The area shall be measured by the smallest square, rectangle, triangle, circle, or combination thereof, which will encompass the entire advertisement. Two advertising displays not exceeding 350 square feet each may be erected in a facing. Any advertising display lawfully in existence on August 1, 1967, that exceeds 1,200 square feet in area, and that is permitted by city or county ordinance, may be maintained in existence.

(b) Advertising displays may not be placed that are so illuminated that they interfere with the effectiveness of, or obscure any official traffic sign, device, or signal; nor shall any advertising display include or be illuminated by flashing, intermittent, or moving lights (except that part necessary to give public service information such as time, date, temperature,
 weather, or similar information); nor shall any advertising display cause beams or rays of light to be directed at the traveled ways if the light is of an intensity or brilliance as to cause glare or to impair the vision of any driver, or to interfere with any driver’s operation of a motor vehicle.

(c) Advertising displays may not be placed to obstruct, or otherwise physically interfere with, an official traffic sign, signal, or device or to obstruct, or physically interfere with, the vision of drivers in approaching, merging, or intersecting traffic.

(d) No advertising display shall be placed within 500 feet from another advertising display on the same side of any portion of an interstate highway or a primary highway that is a freeway. No advertising display shall be placed within 500 feet of an interchange, or an intersection at grade, or a safety roadside rest area on any
 portion of an interstate highway or a primary highway that is a freeway and if the interstate or primary highway is located outside the limits of an incorporated city and outside the limits of an urban area. No advertising display shall be placed within 300 feet from another advertising display on the same side of any portion of a primary highway that is not a freeway if that portion of the primary highway is located outside the limits of an incorporated city and outside the limits of an urban area. No advertising display shall be placed within 100 feet from another advertising display on the same side of any portion of a primary highway that is not a freeway if that portion of the primary highway is located inside the limits of an incorporated city or inside the limits of an urban area.

(e) Subdivision (d) does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Advertising displays that are
 separated by a building or other obstruction in a manner that only one display located within the minimum spacing distances set forth herein is visible from the highway at any one time.

(2) Double-faced, back-to-back, or V-type advertising display, with a maximum of two signs per facing, as permitted in subdivision (a).

(3) Advertising displays permitted by subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 5405. The minimum distance between signs shall be measured along the nearest edge of the pavement between points directly opposite the signs along each side of the highway.

(4) Any advertising display lawfully in existence on August 1, 1967, which does not conform to this subdivision but that is permitted by city or county ordinances.

(f) “Urban area,”
 as used in subdivision (d), shall be determined in accordance with Section 101(a) of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 787, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5408.1.

(a) No advertising display shall be placed or maintained beyond 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway if such advertising display is located outside of an urban area or within that portion of an urban area that is not a business area, is visible from the main traveled way of such highway, and is placed with the purpose of its message being read from such main traveled way, unless such advertising display is included within one of the classes of displays permitted by Section 5405 to be placed within 660 feet from the edge of such highway. Such display may be placed or maintained within the portion of an urban area
 that is also a business area if such display conforms to the criteria for size, spacing and lighting set forth in Section 5408.

(b) Any advertising display which was lawfully in existence on the effective date of the enactment of this section, but which does not conform to the provisions of this section, shall not be required to be removed until January 1, 1980. If federal law requires the state to pay just compensation for the removal of any such display, it may remain in place after January 1, 1980, and until just compensation is paid for its removal pursuant to Section 5412.

(c) For purposes of this section, an urban area means an area so designated in accordance with the provisions of Section 101 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1074.)
-------------------------------------------

5408.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an advertising display is a lawfully erected advertising display and, upon application and payment of the application fee, the director shall issue a permit for the display if it meets all of the following conditions:

(a) The display was erected on property adjacent to State Highway Route 10 (Interstate 10) in the unincorporated area of the County of Los Angeles in order to replace a display which was required to be removed because the property on which it was located was acquired by the State of California to
 facilitate construction of the busway on Route 10 in the County of Los Angeles.

(b) Upon proper application, the display could have qualified for a permit at the time it was erected, except for Sections 5351 and 5408 and Article 5 (commencing with Section 5320) as in effect at the time.

(c) The display conforms to Section 5408 as in effect on January 1, 1984.

(d) The display was in existence on January 1, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5408.3.

Notwithstanding Section 5408, a city or a county with land use jurisdiction over the property may adopt an ordinance that establishes standards for the spacing and sizes of advertising displays that are more restrictive than those imposed by the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 972, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5408.5.

In addition to the advertising displays permitted by Sections 5405 and 5408, advertising displays located on bus passenger shelters or benches and conforming to the following standards may be placed on or adjacent to a highway:

(a) The advertising display may not be within 660 feet of and visible from any federal-aid interstate or primary rural highway, and any advertising display within 660 feet of and visible from any urban highway shall be consistent with federal law and regulations.

(b) The advertising display shall meet
 traffic safety standards of the public entity having operational authority over the highway. These standards may include provisions requiring a finding and certification by an appropriate official that the proposed advertising display does not constitute a hazard to traffic.

(c) Bus passenger shelters or benches with advertising displays may only be placed at approved passenger loading areas.

(d) Bus passenger shelters or benches with advertising displays may only be placed in accordance with a permit or agreement with the public entity having operational authority over the highway adjacent to where, or upon which, the advertising display is to be placed.

(e) Any advertising display on bus passenger shelters or benches may not extend beyond the exterior limits of the shelter or bench.

(f) There may not be more than two advertising displays on any bus passenger shelter.

(g) Advertising displays placed on bus passenger shelters or benches pursuant to a permit or agreement with a local public entity shall not be subject to the state permit requirements specified in Article 6 (commencing with Section 5350).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 452, Sec. 1.)